Missouri, session 2026, HB3504.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 260, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto fifteen new sections, to
be known as sections 260.1160, 260.1162, 260.1164, 260.1166, 260.1168, 260.1170,
260.1172, 260.1174, 260.1176, 260.1178, 260.1180, 260.1182, 260.1184, 260.1186, and
260.1188, to read as follows:
260.1160. Sections 260.1160 to 260.1188 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Producer Responsibility Program for Statewide Recycling Act".
260.1162. As used in sections 260.1160 to 260.1188, unless the context provides
otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Additional producer responsibility organization", a nonprofit organization
designated by the department as an additional producer responsibility organization
under subsection 2 of section 260.1172;
(2) "Advisory board", the producer responsibility program for statewide
recycling advisory board created in section 260.1164;
(3) "Amended plan proposal", an amended plan proposal for the
implementation of the program submitted to the advisory board after the advisory
board's initial review of the plan proposal in accordance with subsection 5 of section
260.1166;
(4) "Collection", the gathering and transportation of covered materials from
covered entities for the purpose of recycling;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3504 2
(5) "Collection rate", the weight of covered materials that are collected under
the program in a calendar year divided by the weight of covered materials used for
products sold or distributed by producers within or into the state in the same calendar
year, expressed as a percentage;
(6) "Compost", the material or product that is developed under controlled
conditions and that results from biological degradation processes by which organic
wastes decompose;
(7) "Compost facility", a site where compost is produced and includes only those
compost facilities that readily accept and process packaging material collected from
consumers;
(8) "Compostable", a covered material associated with organic waste streams
that is capable of undergoing aerobic biological decomposition in a controlled
composting system as demonstrated by meeting ASTM D6400 or ASTM D6868
standards, or any successor standards;
(9) "Consumer", any person who purchases or receives covered materials in the
state and is located at a covered entity;
(10) "Convenience standards", the standards for the program as described in
subsection 3 of section 260.1168;
(11) "Covered entity", the following locations in the state from which covered
materials are collected:
(a) All single-family or multifamily residences in the state; and
(b) Nonresidential locations identified in the final plan, including public places,
small businesses, schools as defined under state law, hospitality locations, and state and
local government buildings;
(12) "Covered materials":
(a) Shall include:
a. Packaging materials except as indicated in paragraph (b) of this subdivision;
and
b. Paper products, except as indicated in paragraph (b) of this subdivision;
(b) Shall not include:
a. Packaging materials intended to be used for the long-term storage or
protection of a durable product and that are intended to transport, protect, or store the
product for at least five years;
b. Paper products that, through their use, could become unsafe or insanitary to
handle;

HB 3504 3
c. Printed paper used to distribute financial statements, billing statements,
medical documents, or other vital documents required to be provided in paper form by
applicable consumer protection laws or other state or federal laws;
d. Bound books;
e. Beverage containers subject to a returnable container deposit, if applicable;
f. Packaging material used exclusively in industrial or manufacturing processes;
g. Packaging material used to contain a product that is regulated as a drug,
medical device, or dietary supplement by the federal Food and Drug Administration
under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Section 301 et seq., as
amended, or any federal regulation promulgated under such act, or any equipment and
materials used to manufacture such products;
h. Packaging material used to contain a product that is regulated as animal
biologics, including vaccines, bacterins, antisera, diagnostic kits, and other products of
biological origin under the federal Virus-Serum-Toxin Act, 21 U.S.C. Section 151 et seq.,
as amended;
i. Packaging material used to contain a product that is regulated under the
Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. Section 136 et seq., as
amended;
j. Packaging material used to contain architectural paint;
k. Packaging material used to contain a product that is required under state law
to be sold in packaging material that meets the standards set forth in the Poison
Prevention Packaging Act of 1970, 15 U.S.C. Section 1471 et seq., as amended;
l. Packaging material used to contain a portable electronic device that has been
repaired and reconditioned to be sold as a refurbished product;
m. Paper products used for a print publication that primarily includes content
derived from primary sources related to news and current events;
n. Packaging material used to contain a product that is regulated as infant
formula as defined in 21 U.S.C. Section 321 (z), as a medical food as defined in 21 U.S.C.
Section 360 ee (b)(3), or as fortified nutritional supplements used for individuals who
require supplemental or sole source nutrition to meet nutritional needs due to special
dietary needs directly related to cancer, chronic kidney disease, diabetes, malnutrition,
or failure to thrive, as those terms are defined by the World Health Organization's
International Classification of Diseases (tenth revision), as amended or revised, or any
other medical conditions as determined by the department by rule; and
o. Any other material that, based on an analysis by the organization of the
operational and financial impacts of the proposed changes and after consultation with
the advisory board, the department determines by rule to not be a covered material;

HB 3504 4
(13) "Department", the department of natural resources;
(14) "Director", the director of the department of natural resources, or the
director's designee;
(15) "Environmentally sound management practices", policies that ensure
compliance with all applicable environmental laws, including laws addressing
recordkeeping, tracking and documenting the disposition of covered materials
collected from covered entities, and environmental liability coverage for professional
services and contractor operations;
(16) "Final plan", the plan proposal or amended plan proposal that has been
designated as the final plan by the director under subsection 5 of section 260.1166;
(17) "Local government", any county, city, or village;
(18) "Materials recovery facility", a facility for processing covered materials
that are collected for recycling before they are conveyed to end-market businesses;
(19) "Mechanical recycling", a form of recycling that does not change the basic
100 molecular structure of the material being recycled;
101 (20) "Minimum recyclable list", the list of covered materials developed under
102 subsection 1 of section 260.1168;
103 (21) "Needs assessment", the assessment of the state's recycling needs conducted
104 under subsection 3 of section 260.1166;
105 (22) "Nonprofit organization", a tax-exempt charitable or social welfare
106 organization operating under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the federal Internal
107 Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
108 (23) "Packaging material":
109 (a) Any of the following:
110 a. Any material, regardless of recyclability, that is intended for single or short-
111 term use and is used for the containment, protection, handling, or delivery of products
112 to the consumer at the point of sale, including through an internet transaction;
113 b. Products supplied to or purchased by consumers for the express purpose of
114 facilitating food or beverage consumption and that are ordinarily disposed of after a
115 single or short-term use and not designed for reuse or refill;
116 c. Paper, plastic, glass, metal, cartons, flexible foam, ridge packaging, or other
117 materials, or combination of these materials; and
118 (b) Shall not include:
119 a. Packaging materials used solely in transportation or distribution to
120 nonconsumers;
121 b. Packaging materials used solely in business-to-business transactions where a
122 covered material is not intended to be distributed to the end consumer;

HB 3504 5
123 c. Packaging materials that are not sold or distributed to covered entities; or
124 d. Packaging materials that are used for products sold or distributed outside the
125 state;
126 (24) "Paper products", paper and other cellulosic fibers whether they are used
127 as a medium for text or images including flyers, brochures, booklets, catalogues,
128 telephone directories, newspapers, magazines, and paper used for writing or any other
129 purpose;
130 (25) "Plan proposal", the plan proposal for the implementation of the program
131 submitted to the advisory board under subsection 4 of section 260.1166;
132 (26) "Postconsumer-recycled-content rate", the amount of postconsumer
133 recycled materials used in the production of covered materials in a calendar year
134 divided by the amount of covered materials used for products sold or distributed by
135 producers within or into their United States market territory in the same calendar year,
136 expressed as a percentage;
137 (27) "Postconsumer recycled material", only those covered materials that have
138 served their intended end use as consumer items and that have been separated or
139 diverted from the waste stream for the purposes of collection and recycling as a
140 secondary material feedstock. "Postconsumer recycled material" includes returns of
141 material from the distribution chain, but excludes waste material generated during or
142 after the completion of a manufacturing process;
143 (28) "Producer":
144 (a) Any of the following:
145 a. If the product is sold or distributed in the state using packaging materials
146 under the manufacturer's own brand or is sold or distributed in the state using
147 packaging materials that lack identification of a brand, the person who manufactures
148 the product;
149 b. If the product is manufactured by a person other than the brand owner, the
150 person who is the licensee of a brand or trademark under which a packaged item is sold
151 or distributed in the state, whether the trademark is registered in the state; or
152 c. If there is no person described in subparagraph a. of this paragraph within the
153 United States, the person who imports the product using covered materials into the
154 United States for use in a commercial undertaking that sells or distributes the item in
155 the state;
156 (b) For the purposes of products that are sold or distributed in the state through
157 an internet transaction:
158 a. The producer of the packaging material used to directly protect or contain the
159 product; or

HB 3504 6
160 b. For the purposes of packaging material used to ship a product to a consumer,
161 the person that packages or ships the product to the consumer;
162 (c) For the purposes of a paper product that is a magazine, newspaper, catalog,
163 telephone directory, or similar publication, the publisher of the paper product;
164 (d) For the purposes of paper products not described in paragraph (c) of this
165 subdivision:
166 a. The person that manufactures the paper product under the manufacturer's
167 own brand; or
168 b. If the paper product is manufactured by a person other than the brand owner,
169 the person that is the owner or licensee of the brand or trademark under which the
170 paper product is used in a commercial undertaking, sold, or distributed in or into the
171 state, whether the trademark is registered in the state; or
172 (e) For any other covered material, the person that first distributes the covered
173 material in or into the state;
174 (29) "Producer responsibility dues", the amounts established in subdivision (9)
175 of subsection 4 of section 260.1166 that a producer participating in the program pays
176 annually into the program under subsection 1 of section 260.1174;
177 (30) "Producer responsibility organization" or "organization", the nonprofit
178 organization designated to implement the program under subdivision (2) of subsection 1
179 of section 260.1166;
180 (31) "Producer responsibility program for statewide recycling" or "program",
181 the producer responsibility program for statewide recycling described under section
182 260.1166;
183 (32) "Proprietary information", information that, if made public:
184 (a) Would divulge competitive business information or trade secrets of the entity
185 that developed the information; or
186 (b) Would reasonably hinder the entity's competitive advantage in the market;
187 (33) "Public place", an indoor or outdoor location in the state that is open to and
188 generally used by the public including, but not limited to, streets; sidewalks; plazas;
189 town squares; state-owned or local-government-owned parks, beaches, and forests;
190 other state-owned or local-government-owned land open for recreation or other public
191 uses; and transportation facilities including bus and train stations and airports. The
192 term "public place" does not include industrial, commercial, or privately owned
193 property;
194 (34) "Readily recyclable material", a covered material that is included on the
195 minimum recyclable list;

HB 3504 7
196 (35) "Recycling", the reprocessing by means of a manufacturing process of a
197 used material into a product or a secondary raw material. The term "recycling" does
198 not include:
199 (a) Energy recovery or energy generation by means of combustion;
200 (b) Use as a fuel;
201 (c) Use as alternative daily cover as defined under the rules and regulations of
202 the department of natural resources; or
203 (d) Landfill disposal of discarded covered materials;
204 (36) "Recycling rate", the weight of covered materials that are recycled under
205 the program in a calendar year divided by the weight of covered materials used for
206 products sold or distributed by producers within or into the state in the same calendar
207 year, expressed as a percentage. The recycling rate is measured at the point where
208 collected covered materials have been prepared for sale or delivery to material
209 reclaimers or end markets after processing at a materials recovery facility or similar
210 establishment that sells directly to reclaimers or end markets;
211 (37) "Recycling services", services provided for the recycling of covered
212 materials, including the collection, transportation, and processing of covered materials
213 from the consumer to the end market. "Recycling services" includes curbside services
214 and drop-off centers;
215 (38) "Recycling services costs", the costs of recycling programs to provide
216 recycling services, including applicable costs related to:
217 (a) The administration of recycling programs;
218 (b) Capital improvements to recycling programs;
219 (c) The collection, transportation, sorting, and processing of covered materials;
220 (d) Public education about recycling programs; and
221 (e) Disposal of nonrecyclable collected covered materials;
222 (39) "Responsible end market", a materials market in which the recycling of
223 materials or the disposal of contaminants is conducted in a way that benefits the
224 environment and minimizes risks to public health and worker health and safety;
225 (40) "Retailer", a person that sells to consumers within or into the state,
226 including sales made through an internet transaction, products for which covered
227 materials are used;
228 (41) "Reuse" or "refill", the return into the marketplace of a covered material
229 that has already been used in the same manner as originally intended without a change
230 in the covered material's purpose, and was intended to be used for its original purpose
231 at least five times;

HB 3504 8
232 (42) "Service provider", a public or private entity, other than the producer
233 responsibility organization, that provides recycling services in the state.
260.1164. 1. There is hereby created in the department of natural resources the
"Producer Responsibility Program for Statewide Recycling Advisory Board". The
department shall select an impartial, third-party facilitator to convene and provide
administrative support to the advisory board.
2. The advisory board shall consist of the following thirteen voting members and
two nonvoting members appointed by the department director:
(1) Three voting members representing local governments in the state,
including:
(a) One member representing a city;
(b) One member representing a county; and
(c) One member representing a local government located in a rural county;
(2) One voting member representing a materials recovery facility;
(3) One voting member representing a hauler of recyclable materials, whether
representing the public or private sector;
(4) One voting member representing an environmental or community-based
nonprofit organization;
(5) One voting member representing a packaging material supplier that is not a
producer, with the member rotating to a packaging material supplier of a different type
of packaging material after each new term;
(6) One voting member representing a manufacturer of recycled paper products
that is not a producer;
(7) One voting member representing a trade association, chamber of commerce,
or other business advocacy organization representing businesses that are headquartered
in the state;
(8) One voting member representing a retailer's association or a retailer that is
not a producer;
(9) One voting member representing a compost facility;
(10) One voting member who has experience in environmental justice and
representing underserved communities;
(11) One voting member representing a solid waste landfill or transfer station
operating an on-site, public-facing recycling collection program;
(12) One nonvoting member representing the department; and
(13) One nonvoting member representing the producer responsibility
organization.

HB 3504 9
3. The members of the advisory board shall have relevant knowledge and
expertise in recycling programs or the impacts of covered materials on the state and the
environment.
4. In appointing members, the director shall ensure to the extent practicable the
geographic diversity of the advisory board's membership, including regions outside of
urban areas.
5. The department director shall make all appointments to the advisory board
no later than December 31, 2027. The appointments for initial terms to the advisory
board shall be staggered so that some of the members serve initial two-year terms and
other members serve initial three-year terms, and all members serve subsequent terms
of three years. The department director shall fill any vacancy by appointment for the
remainder of the unexpired term.
6. The advisory board shall convene its first meeting no later than March 1,
2028. At the first meeting, the voting members shall select a chair and vice chair from
among the voting members for a term not to exceed two years, as determined by the
advisory board. The advisory board shall conduct annual meetings and may conduct
meetings more frequently upon the request of the chair or of at least seven of the voting
members of the advisory board. The organization and the department may provide
technical and staff assistance to the advisory board.
7. The advisory board is subject to the open meetings provisions of the Missouri
sunshine law, in chapter 610.
8. Advisory board members are entitled to be reimbursed at a rate consistent
with other boards and commissions created within the department for necessary travel
within the state and other reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their
official duties.
9. The advisory board shall:
(1) Advise the organization throughout the needs assessment process in
accordance with subsection 3 of section 260.1166;
(2) Review the needs assessment reported to the advisory board under
subsection 3 of section 260.1166;
(3) Review the plan proposal submitted under section 260.1166;
(4) Consult with the organization on amendments to the plan proposal and the
amended plan proposal;
(5) Recommend that the director approve or reject the plan proposal or
amended plan proposal;
(6) Review the annual report submitted by the organization under subsection 2
of section 260.1174; and

HB 3504 10
(7) Consult with the organization on the development and updating of the
minimum recyclable list.
10. In consultation with the organization, the advisory board shall recommend
amendments to the final plan to the director for inclusion in the annual report under
subsection 2 of section 260.1174.
260.1166. 1. (1) On or before June 1, 2028, producers or their designated agents
shall establish a nonprofit organization to fulfill the requirements of sections 260.1160 to
260.1188 and shall provide notification to the department that includes:
(a) The name, address, and contact information of a person responsible for
ensuring the compliance of the nonprofit organization and participating producers
under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188;
(b) A list of participating producers; and
(c) A description of the funding mechanism that the nonprofit organization shall
use to conduct the needs assessment.
(2) Upon receipt of the notification given under subdivision (1) of this subsection,
the director shall:
(a) Acknowledge receipt of the notification; and
(b) Designate the nonprofit organization as the producer responsibility
organization to implement and administer the producer responsibility program for
statewide recycling.
(3) The organization designated by the director under subdivision (2) of this
subsection shall have a governing board with voting members that represent a diverse
range of producers by size and type and represent producers of different types of
covered materials. The members of the governing board shall not have more than one
member per corporate entity. The governing board of the organization shall include
nonvoting members that represent trade associations for types of covered materials.
The organization shall provide public notice of any board meetings at least seventy-two
hours before the board meeting.
2. The producer responsibility organization shall:
(1) Facilitate a needs assessment in consultation with the advisory board;
(2) Consult with the advisory board in the development of the plan proposal
prior to its submission, including in the development of the cost formulas for
reimbursements to service providers under subsection 3 of this section;
(3) Submit a plan proposal in accordance with subsection 4 of this section that
covers a period of five years; and

HB 3504 11
(4) Operate and administer the program in accordance with the final plan, the
provisions of sections 260.1160 to 260.1188, and the rules adopted by the department
under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188.
3. (1) On or before September 1, 2027, the organization shall hire an
independent third party approved by the director to conduct an assessment of the state's
recycling needs. The organization shall issue a request for proposals in accordance with
the provisions of chapter 34, and applicable rules, for the selection of the independent
third party. Prior to the commencement of the needs assessment, the organization shall
consult with the advisory board on the scope of the needs assessment and provide any
necessary recommendations to the third-party consultant conducting the needs
assessment. The needs assessment shall be inclusive of and address the needs of all
geographic areas of the state. At a minimum, the needs assessment shall identify:
(a) The service availability, capacity, performance, and gaps in recycling services
provided to residential covered entities throughout the state and the prices paid for
recycling services;
(b) The documented recycling services costs incurred by public and private
service providers to provide recycling services for residential covered entities;
(c) Demographic factors and other variables to be considered in the development
of reimbursement rates for service providers in accordance with subdivision (10) of
subsection 4 of this section;
(d) The levels of contamination at materials recovery facilities and compost
facilities throughout the state and the impacts of contamination on those facilities;
(e) The service availability, gaps, and recycling services costs associated with
providing recycling services to nonresidential covered entities, with particular attention
to small businesses, and which types and locations of nonresidential covered entities
could be provided with recycling services that would increase statewide collection and
recycling rates in a cost-effective manner;
(f) The processing capacity of existing infrastructure and the additional
infrastructure needed to meet or exceed the convenience standards, reduce
contamination, and improve the quality of recyclable materials and the projected
scenarios for increasing the recycling rate and collection rate of covered materials, as
identified under paragraph (m) of this subdivision;
(g) An evaluation of the opportunities and costs of various service methods to
increase recycling rates overall for specific covered material types;
(h) A proposed list of covered materials for inclusion in the minimum recyclable
list and additional materials that shall be collected in different geographic areas through
curbside services, drop-off centers, or other means;

HB 3504 12
(i) The market conditions and opportunities for the use of recycled covered
materials in the state and in different geographic areas of the state, including the
transportation gaps and opportunities affecting access to markets;
(j) Opportunities for the use of innovative new technologies, including artificial
intelligence technologies, for the recycling and reuse of covered materials;
(k) The availability and scope of any reuse or refill systems in the state affecting
the use of covered materials;
(l) Education needs in the state; and
(m) At least three projected scenarios for increasing the recycling rate and
collection rate of covered materials in the state, including recycling rates and collection
rates that the state could meet by January 1, 2033, and January 1, 2036, and the
operating and capital costs needed to reach each projected scenario, including:
a. A review and assessment of the impact of the exemptions described in
paragraph (b) of subdivision (12) and paragraph (b) of subdivision (23) of section
260.1162, and in section 260.1182 on the feasibility and short-term and long-term
success of the program;
b. A review and assessment of the impact of producer exemptions in other
international and domestic extended producer responsibility programs implemented by
a producer responsibility organization; and
c. A determination of whether any industry sector would be disproportionately
impacted as a result of the exemptions described in paragraph (m) of subdivision (1) of
this subsection; and
(n) The capacity, costs, and gaps for compost facilities to process and recover
compostable materials.
(2) The organization shall consult with the advisory board throughout the needs
assessment process and in determining which projected scenario identified in paragraph
(m) of subdivision (1) of this subsection to implement in its plan proposal.
(3) On or before January 30, 2030, the organization shall report the results of the
needs assessment to the advisory board and the director. The director shall post the
results of the needs assessment on the department's website and provide public notice
and an opportunity to comment on the results of the needs assessment. In finalizing the
needs assessment, the director shall include in the needs assessment a summary of any
100 comments received under this subsection and identify any significant changes made to
101 the needs assessment based on such comments.
102 (4) On or before May 1, 2033, and on or before May first every five years
103 thereafter, the organization shall hire an independent third party approved by the
104 director to conduct an updated assessment of the state's recycling needs to reevaluate

HB 3504 13
105 the program and identify any recycling service needs in the state that are not being met
106 by the program. In consultation with the advisory board, the organization may modify
107 the scope of an updated needs assessment by April 15, 2033, and on or before April
108 fifteenth every five years thereafter. The organization shall report the results of the
109 updated needs assessment to the director in accordance with the reporting requirements
110 set forth in subdivision (3) of this subsection. The organization shall use the findings of
111 the updated needs assessment to create an updated plan proposal and submit the
112 updated plan proposal to the advisory board in accordance with subsection 4 of this
113 section. In consultation with the advisory board and the organization, the director may
114 waive the requirement to conduct an updated needs assessment under this subsection.
115 4. On or before February 1, 2030, the organization shall submit a plan proposal
116 for the program to the advisory board, that, except as set forth in this subsection, only
117 addresses recycling services for residential covered entities. The plan proposal shall
118 cover a period of five years, and an updated plan proposal shall be submitted to the
119 advisory board on or before February first every five years thereafter. Any updated
120 plan proposal shall address recycling services for both residential and any applicable
121 nonresidential covered entities, as identified in the needs assessment under subsection 3
122 of this section. In developing the plan proposal and any updated plan proposals, the
123 organization shall solicit and consider input from the advisory board and provide
124 opportunity for additional stakeholder input. To be approved, a plan proposal shall:
125 (1) Provide contact information for the organization and a representative of the
126 organization;
127 (2) Describe how the plan proposal shall address and implement the findings of
128 the needs assessment;
129 (3) Describe the manner in which the organization solicited and considered
130 input from stakeholders and the advisory board in developing the plan proposal. The
131 organization shall provide a summary of any comments about the plan proposal from
132 the advisory board and additional stakeholders and identify changes made to the plan
133 proposal based on the comments;
134 (4) Describe how the organization shall notify affected producers of their
135 obligations under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188;
136 (5) Describe how the organization shall track compliance among producers and
137 shall collaborate with the director to bring producers into compliance;
138 (6) Include a comprehensive list of the covered materials included in the
139 program in accordance with sections 260.1160 to 260.1188;
140 (7) Establish recycling practices that:
141 (a) Meet or exceed the convenience standards;

HB 3504 14
142 (b) Use open, competitive, and fair procurement practices when entering into
143 contracts with service providers, and, when entering into contracts with private service
144 providers, adopt a preference for service providers with strong labor standards and
145 worker safety practices;
146 (c) Ensure that any covered materials collected for recycling shall be transferred
147 to a responsible end market; and
148 (d) Use environmentally sound management practices;
149 (8) Describe how the organization shall work with newspaper publishers and
150 magazine and periodical publishers to accept print or online advertising in lieu of all or
151 a portion of the producer responsibility dues for newspapers, magazines, and
152 periodicals circulated within the state;
153 (9) Establish a funding mechanism that:
154 (a) Does not exceed the direct and indirect costs of implementing the program,
155 including the costs of:
156 a. Providing recycling services under the program through contracts with
157 service providers or reimbursement of recycling services costs under the reimbursement
158 rates proposed under subdivision (10) of this subsection;
159 b. Meeting the reporting requirements set forth in section 260.1174;
160 c. Conducting the needs assessment;
161 d. Developing and updating the final plan;
162 e. Implementing the education and outreach program under state law;
163 f. Reimbursing the department for its costs in administering and implementing
164 sections 260.1160 to 260.1188, including the costs of the advisory board; and
165 g. Reimbursing the department for the costs of enforcing sections 260.1160 to
166 260.1188;
167 (b) Is funded through producer responsibility dues. The producer
168 responsibility dues shall vary by the type of covered material, whether the material is
169 readily recyclable, and be based on the net recycling services costs for each covered
170 material in the state. The organization may use up to five percent of the producer
171 responsibility dues collected from producers for administration of the program, over the
172 terms of the program, in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, but
173 the organization shall not use any producer responsibility dues collected from producers
174 to pay employee bonuses;
175 (c) Requires:
176 a. Any surplus moneys generated by the program to be placed back into the
177 program for program improvements or a reduction in producer responsibility dues;

HB 3504 15
178 b. The organization to maintain a financial reserve sufficient to operate the
179 program in a fiscally prudent and responsible manner; and
180 c. Annual updates to the producer responsibility dues schedule to reflect changes
181 in program costs and relevant plan revisions and how the organization shall solicit and
182 incorporate input from all producers in setting and revising the annual producer
183 responsibility dues schedule;
184 (d) Includes ecomodulation factors that lower producer responsibility dues to
185 incentivize:
186 a. Reductions in the amount of packaging materials used for products;
187 b. Innovations and practices to enhance the recyclability or commodity value of
188 covered materials;
189 c. High levels of postconsumer recycled material use;
190 d. Designs for the reuse and refill of covered materials; and
191 e. High recycling and refill rates of covered materials;
192 (e) Includes ecomodulation factors that increase producer responsibility dues to
193 discourage:
194 a. Designs and practices that increase the costs of recycling, reusing, or
195 composting covered materials;
196 b. Designs and practices that disrupt the recycling of other materials; and
197 c. Producers from using covered materials that are not on the minimum
198 recyclable list; and
199 (f) At the request of a producer or producers of a covered material, shall include
200 a special assessment paid by the producers of that covered material to cover system
201 improvements that improve the collection and recycling of that covered material or
202 facilitate the addition of the covered material to the list of readily recyclable materials;
203 (10) Include reimbursement rates for one hundred percent of the net recycling
204 services costs of the recycling services provided by service providers under the program
205 consistent with the requirements of section 260.1168. The reimbursement rates shall:
206 (a) Be calculated using an objective cost formula or formulas;
207 (b) Incorporate the relevant cost information identified by the needs assessment
208 under subsection 3 of this section;
209 (c) Be calculated on a per-unit basis such as per ton, per household, or other unit
210 of measurement; and
211 (d) Take into account:
212 a. Regional recycling services costs;
213 b. Population density;
214 c. The number and types of households served;

HB 3504 16
215 d. The collection method used;
216 e. The revenue generated from covered materials;
217 f. The amount of inbound contamination and other factors affecting the quality
218 of covered materials; and
219 g. Other demographic factors identified in the needs assessment under
220 subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this section;
221 (11) Describe the process to evaluate and revise the objective cost formulas as
222 necessary and using documented costs. If the plan proposal includes more than one
223 objective cost formula for recycling services, the plan proposal shall describe the
224 conditions under which each formula shall be applied;
225 (12) Include a schedule of reimbursement rates for service providers that elect to
226 participate in the program and be reimbursed by the organization for providing
227 recycling services for the program and describe a process for updating the schedule
228 periodically and as necessary;
229 (13) Include a proposed budget and a description of the process used to
230 determine producer responsibility dues, including a de minimis level in which no dues
231 are charged and an optional flat rate for producers below a certain size to minimize the
232 administrative and reporting costs of the producers and the organization;
233 (14) Describe a plan that outlines, if the organization ceases to exist or ceases to
234 administer the program, how any producer responsibility dues that have not been used
235 to implement the program shall be transferred to another organization designated by
236 the director under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section to administer the
237 program or shall be transferred to the fund to be managed by the department until
238 transferred to another designated organization;
239 (15) Include the minimum recyclable list established in accordance with section
240 260.1168;
241 (16) Set targets for the minimum collection rates, minimum recycling rates, and
242 minimum postconsumer-recycled-content rates for certain types of covered materials,
243 including paper products, glass, metal, and plastic, that the state shall strive to meet by
244 January 1, 2034, and January 1, 2039;
245 (17) Describe how the organization plans to continue to increase the state's
246 minimum collection rates, minimum recycling rates, and minimum postconsumer-
247 recycled-content rates after January 1, 2034, and January 1, 2039;
248 (18) Describe how the organization shall verify minimum postconsumer-
249 recycled-content rates and how postconsumer-recycled-content rates shall be calculated
250 using weight and other metrics and describe any waivers from minimum postconsumer-
251 recycled-content rates granted to a type or subcategory of covered materials and the

HB 3504 17
252 criteria for evaluating such waivers, including food safety requirements, technological
253 feasibility, or inadequate supply, and how often the waivers shall be reviewed;
254 (19) Describe how the organization shall provide producers with the opportunity
255 to purchase postconsumer-recycled materials from processors at market prices if the
256 producer is interested in obtaining recycled feedstock to achieve minimum
257 postconsumer-recycled-content rates;
258 (20) Describe how the organization shall reduce or offset the producer
259 responsibility dues for any producer or group of producers that fund or operate a
260 collection program that:
261 (a) Covers a specific type of covered material that is not processed by materials
262 recovery facilities; and
263 (b) Has recycling rates that meet or exceed the minimum recycling rate target set
264 forth in the plan proposal under this subsection;
265 (21) Describe how the organization shall work with service providers to:
266 (a) Utilize and expand on existing recycling services and infrastructure and
267 existing education and outreach programs;
268 (b) Reduce contamination of covered materials delivered to materials recovery
269 facilities and compost facilities by:
270 a. Requiring each materials recovery facility and compost facility participating
271 in the program to report annually to the organization on contamination levels at each
272 facility; and
273 b. Providing funding or other assistance to compost facilities to reduce the costs
274 of managing or increase the effectiveness of efforts to manage contamination and to
275 process and recover compostable packaging materials;
276 (c) Invest in new or upgraded recycling infrastructure;
277 (d) Propose an approach to measure and report on the use of reusable and
278 refillable covered materials and establish goals and strategies for increasing the use of
279 reusable and refillable covered materials;
280 (e) Mitigate the impacts of covered materials on other materials and equipment
281 at sorting and processing facilities;
282 (f) Invest in market development for covered materials in the state; and
283 (g) Increase the recycling of collected covered materials;
284 (22) Describe how the organization shall work with and incentivize producers to
285 reduce the packaging of products using covered materials through product design
286 changes, the development or expansion of systems for reusable packaging, and product
287 innovation;

HB 3504 18
288 (23) Describe how the program shall prioritize the use of end markets that
289 return postconsumer recycled materials to their original product type;
290 (24) Describe how the organization shall evaluate and monitor the use of
291 responsible end markets through methods such as processor contracts or financial
292 incentives;
293 (25) Describe how the organization shall implement the education and outreach
294 program;
295 (26) Describe a process and timeline, beginning no later than 2028, to expand
296 recycling services to applicable nonresidential covered entities, as identified in the needs
297 assessment under subsection 3 of this section; and
298 (27) Include any additional information required by the department.
299 5. (1) The advisory board shall review the plan proposal for compliance with
300 sections 260.1160 to 260.1188. The advisory board shall consult with the organization
301 throughout its review of the plan proposal. Within ninety days after the submission of
302 the plan proposal to the advisory board, the advisory board shall either provide any
303 recommended amendments to the plan proposal to the organization or, if the advisory
304 board does not have any recommended amendments, forward the plan proposal to the
305 director. The organization shall provide responsive answers to the advisory board's
306 recommendations and submit the amended plan proposal to the advisory board within
307 sixty days after its receipt of the recommended amendments. Within forty-five days
308 after the submission of the amended plan proposal to the advisory board, the advisory
309 board shall forward the amended plan proposal to the director with its recommendation
310 for approval or rejection and, if applicable, a written explanation of the basis for
311 recommending rejection of the plan proposal. Within eight days after receiving the plan
312 proposal, the director shall post the plan proposal on the department's website and
313 provide public notice and an opportunity to comment on the plan proposal.
314 (2) Within one hundred twenty days after receiving the plan proposal or
315 amended plan proposal, the director shall:
316 (a) Approve the plan proposal or amended plan proposal; or
317 (b) Reject the plan proposal or amended plan proposal.
318 (3) If the director rejects the plan proposal or amended plan proposal, the
319 director shall notify the organization of the rejection and the reasons for the rejection.
320 The reasons shall be based on the failure of the plan proposal or amended plan proposal
321 to comply with the requirements specified in subsection 4 of this section. The
322 organization shall submit a new plan proposal to the advisory board within sixty days
323 after receiving the director's rejection. The new plan proposal shall be reviewed by the

HB 3504 19
324 advisory board and the new plan proposal or new amended plan proposal shall be
325 reviewed and approved or rejected by the director in accordance with this subsection.
326 (4) (a) If the director approves the plan proposal or amended plan proposal
327 under this subsection, the director shall designate the plan proposal or amended plan
328 proposal as the final plan and shall publish the final plan on the department's website.
329 (b) The organization shall begin implementing the final plan within six months
330 after it is approved.
331 6. (1) The organization shall submit proposed amendments to the final plan
332 annually to the advisory board for inclusion in the annual report under section
333 260.1174. At least sixty days prior to the deadline to submit the annual report, the
334 department shall request that the organization submit an amendment to the annual plan
335 to address a specific concern or aspect of the plan. At least thirty days prior to
336 submitting the annual report under section 260.1174, the organization shall consult with
337 the advisory board on any proposed amendments to the final plan. The advisory board
338 shall submit any proposed amendments to the director. The director shall approve or
339 reject the proposed amendments based on the plan proposal requirements specified in
340 subsection 4 of this section.
341 (2) The organization shall continue to operate the program in accordance with
342 the final plan pending the approval or rejection of a proposed amendment by the
343 director. The director's rejection of a proposed amendment under this subsection does
344 not relieve the organization of its responsibility to continue to operate the program in
345 accordance with the final plan.
346 7. The director shall enforce sections 260.1160 to 260.1188 and the department
347 shall promulgate rules as may be necessary for the administration of sections 260.1160
348 to 260.1188. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the organization shall not make
349 any determination as to a person's compliance under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188.
350 8. (1) On January 1, 2030, and each January first thereafter, as an alternative to
351 participating in the program, a producer shall submit to the advisory board an
352 individual program plan proposal. A producer shall notify the department of its intent
353 to submit an individual program plan proposal by January 1, 2029, and by each
354 January first thereafter. The individual program plan proposal shall:
355 (a) Comply with the requirements of subsection 4 of this section, as applicable;
356 (b) Describe how the producer participating in the individual program plan
357 proposal shall contribute to the costs of the department in overseeing the program;
358 (c) Describe how the producer shall reimburse service providers that provide
359 recycling services for the covered materials covered by the individual program plan
360 proposal; and

HB 3504 20
361 (d) Describe any alternative collection programs run by the producer and its
362 recycling rates.
363 (2) The advisory board shall review and make recommendations on, and the
364 director shall approve or reject, any individual program plan proposals in accordance
365 with the procedures set forth in subsection 5 of this section. After the director approves
366 the individual program plan proposal, the director shall designate the individual
367 program plan proposal as the plan that the producer is authorized to implement and
368 administer as an alternative to participating in the program.
369 (3) The producer implementing a plan described in this subsection shall submit
370 any amendments to the plan to the advisory board in accordance with subsection 6 of
371 this section. The advisory board shall review and make recommendations on, and the
372 director shall approve or reject, any amendments to the plan in accordance with
373 subsection 6 of this section.
260.1168. 1. (1) The organization shall develop a minimum recyclable list based
on the availability of recycling services, recycling collection and processing
infrastructure, and recycling end markets for covered materials, as determined by
the needs assessment.
(2) The organization shall update the minimum recyclable list, and submit any
updates for inclusion in the annual report under section 260.1174, in response to
recycling collection and processing improvements and changes in recycling end markets.
The advisory board shall consult with the organization on any updates to the minimum
recyclable list in accordance with the procedures set forth in subsection 5 of section
260.1166.
2. (1) To be eligible for reimbursement for recycling services provided under the
program, service providers shall provide recycling services for all readily recyclable
materials in a manner that facilitates attaining the rate targets established in the final
plan under subsection 4 of section 260.1166.
(2) The director may grant a service provider an exception to the requirements
under subdivision (1) of this subsection if the service provider demonstrates to the
reasonable satisfaction of the director that it is not able to provide recycling services or
meet the convenience standards for a readily recyclable material.
(3) Service providers are eligible for reimbursement from the organization for
the collection of covered materials that are not included in the minimum recyclable list
for the regions where the organization has established a reasonable cost for the
supplemental collection of covered materials that are not readily recyclable and a
responsible end market has been established. The services described in this subdivision
are not subject to the convenience standards.

HB 3504 21
(4) The organization shall reimburse service providers for the recycling services
costs to provide recycling services for all readily recyclable materials and covered
materials that the organization approves under subdivision (3) of this subsection.
(5) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, nothing in sections 260.1160 to
260.1188 shall restrict a service provider from collecting or processing covered materials
that are not included in the minimum recyclable list.
3. (1) The organization shall contract with service providers to provide covered
entities with convenient and equitable access to recycling services for all readily
recyclable materials, at no charge to the covered entity, with the goal of achieving the
recycling rate, collection rate, and postconsumer-recycled-content rate targets
established in the final plan under section 260.1166.
(2) The collection of readily recyclable materials shall be provided in a manner
that is as convenient as the collection of solid waste in the geographic area in which the
covered entity is located.
(3) Any covered entities in the state that are receiving recycling services on
December 31, 2026, shall continue to receive equivalent recycling services through the
program or a service provider on and after December 31, 2026.
(4) The organization shall not restrict a person's ability to contract directly with
service providers to obtain recycling services for covered materials.
(5) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, nothing in sections 260.1160 to
260.1188 voids or cancels any contract between a resident and a service provider for the
provision of recycling services that is executed prior to December 31, 2026.
260.1170. 1. The organization shall develop and implement a statewide
education and outreach program that is designed to increase the recycling and reuse of
covered materials and includes education and outreach on:
(1) Proper end-of-life management of covered materials;
(2) The location and availability of recycling services under the program; and
(3) How to prevent littering in the process of providing recycling services for
covered materials.
2. The education and outreach program shall, at a minimum:
(1) Provide clear and concise recycling instructions that are consistent statewide
and accessible for all demographic groups;
(2) Coordinate with existing recycling education materials and services provided
throughout the state; and
(3) Be designed to help the state achieve the minimum collection rate and
minimum recycling rate targets established in the final plan under section 260.1166 and

HB 3504 22
reduce levels and impacts of inbound contamination from covered materials at
materials recovery facilities and compost facilities.
3. The organization shall consult with the advisory board and other entities
providing recycling education in the state on the development and distribution of
education outreach services and materials. The organization shall contract with service
providers, local governments, and nonprofit organizations to conduct recycling
education and outreach services under the education and outreach program
developed under subsection 1 of this section.
4. The organization shall develop a proposed methodology for evaluating and
reporting on the effectiveness of the education and outreach program.
260.1172. 1. Beginning July 1, 2029, a producer shall not sell or distribute any
products that use covered materials in the state unless the producer is participating in
the program or, on or after January 1, 2029, except as set forth in the final plan or any
other plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188. A producer
shall report the data necessary to meet its plan obligations and shall use prorated
national data if state-specific data is not available or feasible to generate.
2. (1) On January 1, 2033, and every January first thereafter, a nonprofit
organization may request that the director designate the nonprofit organization as an
additional producer responsibility organization.
(2) The director may designate a nonprofit organization as an additional
producer responsibility organization if the director, in coordination with the advisory
board, determines that the designation of the additional producer responsibility
organization is necessary to:
(a) Increase recycling rates;
(b) Expand recycling services to covered entities that are not covered under the
final plan; or
(c) Provide recycling services for a specific type of covered material.
(3) If the director designates an additional producer responsibility organization
under paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of this subsection, the additional producer
responsibility organization shall submit a coordination plan to the director for approval
in accordance with the rules promulgated. Within one hundred twenty days after the
designation of the first additional producer responsibility organization, the director
shall promulgate by rule standards and requirements for a coordination plan and for
coordination between the organization and any additional producer responsibility
organizations designated by the director. A coordination plan approved or ordered by
the director shall be implemented by the organization and any additional producer
responsibility organizations designated by the director. If the coordination plan

HB 3504 23
conflicts with the final plan or any other plan approved by the director under sections
260.1160 to 260.1188, the provisions of the coordination plan prevail. A coordination
plan approved or ordered by the director is valid until revoked or until a new
coordination plan is approved or ordered by the director.
3. The director, the advisory board, the organization, an additional producer
responsibility organization, and any other person administering a plan approved by the
director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188:
(1) Shall keep confidential any proprietary information provided by a producer;
and
(2) Shall not include any proprietary information provided by a producer in the
plan proposal, the amended plan proposal, the final plan, any other plan approved by
the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188, or any amendment to the final plan or
other plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188.
4. (1) The program and any other plan approved by the director under sections
260.1160 to 260.1188 shall comply with any fire, solid waste, or other relevant
ordinances or resolutions adopted by a local government and with applicable state and
federal laws.
(2) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a local government is not required
to provide recycling services under the program or any other plan approved by the
director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188. To the extent that a local government
elects to provide recycling services under the program or any other plan approved by
the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188, the organization, additional producer
responsibility organization, or other person responsible for administering a plan
approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188 shall reimburse the local
government for those recycling services and the final plan or any other plan approved
by the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188.
(3) A local government that receives reimbursement funds from the organization
shall use such funds for the local government's recycling program.
5. The organization, any additional producer responsibility organization, and
any person administering a plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to
260.1188 shall cause to be conducted an annual financial audit of the program or any
other plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188 by an
independent third-party auditor. The audit shall include a detailed list of the program's
or plan's costs and revenues from the producer responsibility dues.
6. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the organization and any additional
producer responsibility organization shall not be considered a state-sponsored or state-

HB 3504 24
owned entity. Employees of the organization and any additional producer responsibility
organization shall not be considered employees of the state.
7. The organization, any additional producer responsibility organization, and
any person administering a plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to
260.1188 shall preserve all books and records in accordance with state and federal laws
and be open to inspection by the department at any time.
260.1174. 1. (1) Except as set forth in a plan approved by the director under
sections 260.1160 to 260.1188 on or after January 1, 2033, by a date determined by the
organization that is no later than January 1, 2030, and annually thereafter by a date
determined by the organization, a producer shall pay producer responsibility dues to
the organization based on the funding mechanism described in the plan proposal under
section 260.1166.
(2) A producer shall make all documents and records related to the calculation
and payment of producer responsibility dues, recycling rates, collection rates,
postconsumer-recycled-content rates, and any other materials necessary for the
director to determine compliance with sections 260.1160 to 260.1188 available for
inspection by the director. In connection with enforcing a violation by a producer under
section 260.1176, the director shall request in writing that the producer provide any
such documents or records to the director.
(3) The organization, any additional producer responsibility organization, and
any person administering a plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to
260.1188 shall maintain all documents and records necessary for the director to
determine compliance with sections 260.1160 to 260.1188 and submit any such
documents and records to the director upon a request by the director under this
subsection.
(4) By January 1, 2030, and each year thereafter, the director shall develop an
ecomodulation bonus schedule that is designed to reduce the producer responsibility
dues of producers that meet certain benchmarks established by the director by rule.
The director shall consult with the organization and the advisory board in developing
the ecomodulation bonus schedule. The organization shall reduce the producer
responsibility dues of producers in accordance with the ecomodulation bonus schedule
developed by the director.
2. (1) Before April first of the second year of the program's implementation, and
by April first each year thereafter, the organization shall submit a report to the advisory
board describing the progress of the program. Within two years after the
implementation of the final plan or any updated plan proposals submitted to the
advisory board under section 260.1166 the report shall also include an evaluation of the

HB 3504 25
impacts of the exemptions described in section 260.1182 on the performance of the
program and the producer responsibility dues schedule. The advisory board shall
review the report and forward the report to the director. The advisory board shall also
review any proposed amendments to the final plan and any updates to the minimum
recyclable list and forward the amendments and updates to the director with its
recommendation for approval or rejection. The director shall post the report on the
department's website. The program report shall include the following information from
the preceding calendar year:
(a) A detailed description of the progress toward each element of the final plan
as described in subsection 4 of section 260.1166;
(b) A list of all the producers, brands, and covered materials covered by the final
plan;
(c) A list of producers that are not participating in the program and any
producers that shall be out of compliance with one or more obligations imposed by
sections 260.1160 to 260.1188;
(d) The total weight of the covered materials that producers used for products
that are sold or distributed in the state;
(e) The total amount of producer responsibility dues collected under the
program, including an annual schedule of producer responsibility dues assessed by
weight for each type of covered material and any annual increases or decreases in the
dues schedule and the reasons for these adjustments;
(f) The total weight of each type of covered material that is collected and
recycled under the program, with the data broken down by:
a. Means of collection, including by curbside service or drop-off center or other
means;
b. The number of covered entities, by type and by county, serviced through
curbside collection;
c. The method used to handle the collected covered material; and
d. Geographic area;
(g) The recycling rate, collection rate, and postconsumer-recycled-content rate
for each type of covered material and a description of the organization's process in
achieving the minimum rate targets set forth in the final plan under subsection 4 of
section 260.1166;
(h) The rate schedules for reimbursement to service providers, any proposed
adjustments to the rate schedules, and a summary of any disputes arising between the
organization and service providers concerning rates and how the disputes were
addressed;

HB 3504 26
(i) A summary of the education and outreach efforts implemented in accordance
with section 260.1170, including:
a. Samples of any materials distributed; and
b. A description of the methodology used and the results of the evaluation
conducted under section 260.1170;
(j) A list of the names, locations, and hours of operation for curbside services,
drop-off centers, and other entities accepting or collecting covered materials under the
program;
(k) A description of the organization's efforts to ensure that covered materials
have been responsibly managed and delivered to responsible end markets under the
program;
(l) A list of the recycling end markets of any covered materials, and, if the
covered materials are processed through a method other than mechanical recycling, the
list shall include:
a. A description of how the method shall affect the ability to recycle the covered
material into feedstock for the manufacture of new products;
b. A description of how the method shall increase the types and amounts of
recycled plastic for food and pharmaceutical-grade packaging and applications;
c. A description of any applicable state and federal air, water, and waste
permitting compliance requirements for the method; and
d. An analysis of the environmental impacts of the method compared to the
environmental impacts of incineration of solid waste in landfills;
(m) A copy of an independent third party's report auditing the program under
subsection 5 of section 260.1172;
(n) A description of the status of reserve funds, an assessment of the adequacy of
those funds to cover program costs, and a description of how any program shortfalls
shall be addressed;
(o) Any amendments to the final plan in accordance with section 260.1166;
(p) Any updates to the minimum recyclable list in accordance with section
260.1168; and
(q) A description of the advisory board's feedback on any amendments to the
100 final plan under section 260.1166.
101 (2) Before April first of the second year of any plan approved by the director
102 under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188 that is not the final plan, and by April first each
103 year thereafter, an additional producer responsibility organization or other person
104 responsible for administering a plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160
105 to 260.1188 shall submit a report to the advisory board describing the progress of the

HB 3504 27
106 plan. The report shall include the information described in this subsection, as
107 applicable, from the preceding calendar year. The advisory board shall review the
108 report and forward the report to the director. The advisory board shall also review any
109 proposed amendments to the plan and forward the amendments to the director with its
110 recommendation for approval or rejection. The director shall post the report on the
111 department's website.
112 (3) The director shall annually compile the results of the reports received under
113 this subsection into a general report describing the progress of the program and any
114 other plans approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188. The director
115 shall include the department's activities and expenses that were reimbursed under
116 section 260.1186 in the general report. Additionally, at least every three years starting in
117 2028, the director shall include in the general report the outcome of the consumer cost
118 impact review conducted by the department under this subsection. The director shall
119 post the report on the department's website and submit the report to the governor and
120 shall annually present the general report to the general assembly.
121 3. If, based on the annual report submitted under subsection 2 of this section, the
122 program or any other plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188
123 is not on track to meet the minimum collection rates, minimum recycling rates, or
124 minimum postconsumer-recycled-content rates set forth in the program or plan, the
125 director may require the organization, with respect to the program, or the additional
126 producer responsibility organization or other person responsible for administering the
127 plan, with respect to any other plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to
128 260.1188, to amend its respective plan under section 260.1166.
129 4. No less than every three years, starting on January 1, 2032, the department
130 shall conduct a review of consumer cost impacts resulting from the program, including
131 assessments of increased prices for covered materials relative to the prices for those
132 materials in other states, as well as local government expenditures and consumer
133 spending on recycling services and trash collection and disposal.
260.1176. 1. If the organization, an additional producer responsibility
organization, a person administering a plan approved by the director under sections
260.1160 to 260.1188, or a producer violates any portion of sections 260.1160 to 260.1188,
the organization, additional producer responsibility organization, person administering
a plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188, or producer is
liable for an administrative penalty not to exceed:
(1) For a first violation, an initial penalty of five thousand dollars for the first
day of each violation and one thousand five hundred dollars per day for each day the
violation continues;

HB 3504 28
(2) For a second violation committed within twelve months after a prior
violation, an initial penalty of ten thousand dollars for the first day of each violation and
three thousand dollars per day for each day the violation continues; and
(3) For a third or subsequent violation committed within twelve months after
two or more prior violations, an initial penalty of twenty thousand dollars for the first
day of each violation and six thousand dollars per day for each day the violation
continues.
2. (1) If the organization, an additional producer responsibility organization, a
person administering a plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to
260.1188, or a producer violates any portion of sections 260.1160 to 260.1188, the
director shall serve by personal service or by certified mail an order that imposes an
administrative penalty on the organization, additional producer responsibility
organization, person administering a plan approved by the director under sections
260.1160 to 260.1188, or producer.
(2) The organization, additional producer responsibility organization, person
administering a plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188, or
producer aggrieved or adversely affected by the director's order may submit a notice of
appeal to the administrative hearing commission. The appeal shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of section 621.250.
3. The director may enter into a settlement agreement with the organization,
additional producer responsibility organization, person administering a plan approved
by the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188, or producer assessed an
administrative penalty under this section.
4. The director shall transfer any moneys collected under this section to the state
treasurer, who shall credit the moneys as set forth in section 7, Article IX of the
Constitution of Missouri.
5. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, nothing in sections 260.1160 to
260.1188:
(1) Creates a private right of action; or
(2) Authorizes enforcement of sections 260.1160 to 260.1188 against anyone
other than the organization, an additional producer responsibility organization, a
person administering a plan approved by the director under sections 260.1160 to
260.1188, or a producer.
260.1178. If the program or any other plan approved by the director under
sections 260.1160 to 260.1188 engages in an activity performed solely in furtherance of
implementing the program or plan and in compliance with sections 260.1160 to
260.1188, the activity is not a violation of the antitrust, restraint of trade, and unfair

HB 3504 29
trade practices provisions of the Missouri antitrust law under sections 416.011 to
416.161.
260.1180. Nothing in sections 260.1160 to 260.1188 affects a person's eligibility
for any state or local incentive programs for which the person is otherwise eligible.
260.1182. 1. A producer is exempt from the requirements of sections 260.1160 to
260.1188 if the producer is:
(1) A person with less than five million dollars in realized gross total revenue, not
including on-premises alcohol sales, during the prior calendar year;
(2) A person that has used less than one ton of covered materials for products
sold or distributed within or into the state during the prior calendar year;
(3) The state or a local government;
(4) A nonprofit organization;
(5) An agricultural employer, as the term is used in chapter 288, regardless of
where the agricultural employer is located, with less than five million dollars in realized
gross total revenue in the state from consumer sales of agricultural products sold under
the brand name of the farmer, egg producer, grower, or individual grower cooperative;
(6) An individual business operating a retail food establishment that is located at
a physical business location and that is licensed by local public health agencies, or city or
county health departments under the standards adopted by the Missouri department of
health and senior services; or
(7) A builder, a construction company, or construction contractors.
2. The department shall adjust by rule the dollar limitation set forth in
subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section on July 1, 2027, and on July first of each
year thereafter, based on the percentage increase measured by the Consumer Price
Index for All Urban Consumers for the United States, or its successor index, as defined
and officially recorded by the United States Department of Labor, or its successor
agency, for the preceding year.
260.1184. 1. A person shall not charge any kind of point-of-sale or point-of-
collection fee to consumers to recoup its costs in meeting the obligations of or complying
with sections 260.1160 to 260.1188.
2. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a private service provider is not
required to provide recycling services under the program or any other plan approved by
the director under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188.
260.1186. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Producer
Responsibility Program for Statewide Recycling Fund", which shall consist of all
producer dues collected and transferred to the fund under sections 260.1160 to 260.1188
and moneys appropriated to the fund by the general assembly for use by the department

HB 3504 30
of natural resources. The organization shall transmit a portion of the producer
responsibility dues to the state treasurer for deposit into the fund for purposes of
reimbursing:
(1) The department, including the advisory board, for the reasonable costs
incurred in administering and implementing any portion of sections 260.1160 to
260.1188; and
(2) The department for the reasonable costs incurred in enforcing sections
260.1160 to 260.1188 as indicated in section 260.1176.
2. (1) By July 1, 2030, the department shall notify the organization of the costs in
administering, implementing, and enforcing sections 260.1160 to 260.1188 since August
28, 2026;
(2) By July first of each year after July 1, 2030, the department shall notify the
organization of the costs of administering, implementing, and enforcing sections
260.1160 to 260.1188 during the immediately preceding year; and
(3) Upon receipt of the department's cost accounting, the organization shall
transmit to the state treasurer, for deposit in the fund, an amount of producer
responsibility dues necessary to reimburse the department for its costs.
3. (1) The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund
shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used
solely for the purposes of sections 260.1160 to 260.1188.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
260.1188. The director shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for
the administration of sections 260.1160 to 260.1188. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul

HB 3504 31
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔